Hawaii statutes.
§711-1108 Abuse of a corpse. (1) A
person commits the offense of abuse of a corpse if, except as authorized by
law, the person treats a human corpse in a way that the person knows would
outrage ordinary family sensibilities.

(2) The preparation of a corpse for burial or
cremation in a manner consistent with traditional Hawaiian cultural customs and
practices shall not be a violation of this section.

(3) The burial or cremation of a corpse
prepared consistent with traditional Hawaiian cultural customs and practices
shall not be a violation of this section.

(4) Abuse of a corpse is a misdemeanor. [L
1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1993; am L 2015, c 171, §2]

COMMENTARY ON §711-1108

This section prohibits any sort of outrageous treatment of a
human corpse, including sexual contact (necrophilia) and physical abuse. It
does not, of course, relate to legally authorized activities of undertakers and
physicians. Knowledge that ordinary family sensibilities would be outraged
must be proved.

Previous Hawaii law prohibited the disinterment, disturbance,
or scattering of any human body that has been legally interred.[1] Section
711-1108 is more comprehensive in coverage.

__________

§711-1108 Commentary:

1. H.R.S. §734-3.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §711-1108

Act 171, Session Laws 2015, amended this section to
recognize and support traditional Hawaiian burial or cremation practices by
clarifying that the preparation, burial, or cremation of a corpse in a manner
consistent with Hawaiian cultural customs and practices is not a violation of
the Penal Code's prohibition of abuse of a corpse. The legislature found that
Act 171 was necessary to address confusion about whether the use of traditional
Hawaiian customs and practices to prepare human remains for burial or cremation
and the burial or cremation of a corpse prepared consistent with those customs
and practices violate the law. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 339, House
Standing Committee Report No. 1383.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next